Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1095.
do enact as follows:SB1095,11Section 1. 234.165 (2) (dm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1095,2,62234.165 (2) (dm) The authority shall allocate a portion of its surplus in a plan 3prepared under par. (b) to the property tax deferral loan program under ss. 234.621 4to 234.626. The authority may spend up to 5 percent of the amount allocated under 5this paragraph to establish and administer a marketing program to advertise the 6property tax deferral loan program.SB1095,27Section 2. 234.623 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1095,2,128234.623 (5) The participant earned no more than $20,000 in income, as 9defined under s. 71.52 (5), 80 percent of the area median income, as defined in s. 10234.66 (1) (a), of the county in which the property is located in the year prior to the 11year in which the property taxes or special assessments for which the loan is made 12are due.SB1095,313Section 3. 234.625 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1095,3,814234.625 (1) The authority shall enter into agreements with participants and 15their co-owners to loan funds to pay property taxes and special assessments on 16their qualifying dwelling units. The Subject to sub. (1m), the maximum loan under 17ss. 234.621 to 234.626 in any one year is limited to the lesser of $3,525 $5,000 or the 1amount obtained by adding the property taxes levied on the qualifying dwelling 2unit for the year for which the loan is sought, the special assessments levied on the 3dwelling unit, and the interest and penalties for delinquency attributable to the 4property taxes or special assessments. Loans shall bear interest at a rate equal to 5the prime lending rate at the time the rate is set, as reported by the federal reserve 6board in federal reserve statistical release H. 15, plus 1 percent. The executive 7director shall set the rate no later than October 15 of each year, and that rate shall 8apply to loans made in the following year.SB1095,49Section 4. 234.625 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1095,3,1410234.625 (1m) The authority shall annually, as of January 1, adjust the 11maximum loan amount under sub. (1), rounded to the nearest whole dollar, to 12reflect any changes in the U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. 13city average, as determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the 12-month 14period ending on the preceding June 30.SB1095,515Section 5. Initial applicability.SB1095,3,1816(1) The treatment of ss. 234.623 (5) and 234.625 (1) first applies to property 17tax deferral loans under ss. 234.621 to 234.626 for which applications are filed on 18the effective date of this subsection.SB1095,3,1919